sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije dežne palice: Bambusova cev; Cev iz kompozitnih materialov; Plastična cev; Tradicionalna (ogrodje kaktusa); Lesena cev; Drugo
lt-LT: Lietaus lazdelės konstrukcijos tipas: Bambuko vamzdis; Kompozitinės medžiagos vamzdis; Plastikinis vamzdis; Tradicinė (kaktuso skeletas); Medinis vamzdis; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do bastão de chuva: Tubo de bambu; Tubo de material compósito; Tubo de plástico; Tradicional (esqueleto de cato); Tubo de madeira; Outro
th: ประเภทโครงสร้าง Rainstick: ท่อไม้ไผ่; ท่อวัสดุคอมโพสิต; ท่อพลาสติก; แบบดั้งเดิม (โครงสร้างกระบองเพชร); ท่อไม้; อื่นๆ
en: Rainstick construction type: Bamboo tube; Composite material tube; Plastic tube; Traditional (cactus skeleton); Wood tube; Other
de: Konstruktionsart des Regenstabs: Bambusrohr; Verbundwerkstoffrohr; Kunststoffrohr; Traditionell (Kaktusskelett); Holzrohr; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije kišnog štapa: Bambusova cijev; Cijev od kompozitnih materijala; Plastična cijev; Tradicionalna (kostur kaktusa); Drvena cijev; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie dažďovej palice: Bambusová trubica; Trubica z kompozitného materiálu; Plastová trubica; Tradičná (kostra kaktusu); Drevená trubica; Iné
tr: Rainstick yapım türü: Bambu tüp; Kompozit malzeme tüp; Plastik tüp; Geleneksel (kaktüs iskeleti); Ahşap tüp; Diğer
fr: Type de construction du bâton de pluie: Tube en bambou; Tube en matériau composite; Tube en plastique; Traditionnel (squelette de cactus); Tube en bois; Autre
it: Tipo di costruzione del bastone della pioggia: Tubo di bambù; Tubo in materiale composito; Tubo di plastica; Tradizionale (scheletro di cactus); Tubo di legno; Altro
pl: Typ konstrukcji Rainstick: Rura bambusowa; Rura z materiału kompozytowego; Plastikowa rura; Tradycyjna (szkielet kaktusa); Drewniana rura; Inne
nl: Rainstick constructietype: Bamboebuis; Buis van composietmateriaal; Plastic buis; Traditioneel (cactusskelet); Houten buis; Overig
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al unui baston de ploaie: Tub de bambus; Tub din material compozit; Tub de plastic; Tradițional (schelet de cactus); Tub de lemn; Altele
ja: レインスティック構造タイプ: 竹筒; 複合材チューブ; プラスチックチューブ; 伝統的 (サボテンの骨格); 木製チューブ; その他
ko: 레인스틱 구조 유형: 대나무관; 복합 소재관; 플라스틱관; 전통식(선인장 뼈대); 나무관; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de construção do pau de chuva: Tubo de bambu; Tubo de material compósito; Tubo de plástico; Tradicional (esqueleto de cacto); Tubo de madeira; Outros
zh-CN: 雨声器构造类型: 竹管; 复合材料管; 塑料管; 传统（仙人掌骨架）; 木管; 其他
zh-TW: 雨聲筒結構類型: 竹管; 複合材質管; 塑膠管; 傳統式 (仙人掌骨架); 木管; 其他
da: Regnmagers konstruktionstype: Bambusrør; Kompositmaterialerør; Plastrør; Traditionel (kaktusskelet); Trærør; Andet
nb: Konstruksjonstype for regnstav: Bambusrør; Rør i komposittmateriale; Plastrør; Tradisjonell (kaktusskjelett); Trerør; Annet
el: Τύπος κατασκευής του rainstick: Σωλήνας από μπαμπού; Σωλήνας από σύνθετο υλικό; Πλαστικός σωλήνας; Παραδοσιακός (από σκελετό κάκτου); Ξύλινος σωλήνας; Άλλο
ru: Тип конструкции рейнстика: Бамбуковая трубка; Трубка из композитного материала; Пластиковая трубка; Традиционный (каркас кактуса); Деревянная трубка; Другое
sv: Rainstick-konstruktionstyp: Bamburör; Rör i kompositmaterial; Plaströr; Traditionell (kaktusskelett); Trärör; Övrigt
fi: Sadeputken rakenne: Bambuputki; Komposiittimateriaaliputki; Muoviputki; Perinteinen (kaktuksen runko); Puuputki; Muu
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на пръчката за дъжд: Бамбукова тръба; Тръба от композитен материал; Пластмасова тръба; Традиционен (скелет на кактус); Дървена тръба; Други
es: Tipo de construcción de palo de lluvia: Tubo de bambú; Tubo de material compuesto; Tubo de plástico; Tradicional (esqueleto de cactus); Tubo de madera; Otro
hu: Esőbot szerkezeti típusa: Bambuszcső; Kompozit anyagú cső; Műanyag cső; Hagyományos (kaktuszváz); Facső; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu cấu trúc nhạc cụ tạo tiếng mưa (rainstick): Ống tre; Ống vật liệu composite; Ống nhựa; Truyền thống (xương rồng); Ống gỗ; Khác
cs: Typ konstrukce dešťové hole: Bambusová trubice; Trubice z kompozitního materiálu; Plastová trubice; Tradiční (kostra kaktusu); Dřevěná trubice; Ostatní